Hawaii statutes.
[§76-11.6] Special, research, or
demonstration project positions. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
with the approval of the governor, the head of a department may establish and
abolish any subordinate position for an employee engaged in a special,
research, or demonstration project that is approved by the governor, subject to
the limitations of available appropriations. [L 2015, c 160, §3]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next